Hawaii statutes.
§291C-64 Vehicle entering highway from
private road or driveway. The driver of a vehicle about to enter or cross
a highway (including bicycle lane or bicycle path) from an alley, building,
private road, or driveway or from any public or private property other than a
highway that is adjacent to the highway, shall yield the right-of-way to all
vehicles or bicycles approaching on the highway (including bicycle lane or
bicycle path) to be entered. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1; am L 1977, c 180, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next